Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF211.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1245SV (3) 91 jda/jh S.F. 211 Section 1. Section 256.7, subsection 21, paragraph b, 1 subparagraph (2), unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended 2 to read as follows: 3 For the school year beginning July 1, 2018, and each 4 succeeding school year, the The rules shall also require all 5 of the following: 6 Sec. 2. Section 256.7, subsection 21, paragraph b, 7 subparagraph (2), Code 2025, is amended by adding the following 8 new subparagraph division: 9 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH DIVISION . (e) That any school district, 10 accredited nonpublic school, or charter school providing 11 instruction delivered primarily over the internet pursuant to 12 subsection 32 may administer any state assessment required 13 pursuant to this subsection in an online setting that is 14 similar to the studentâs regular academic instruction, if all 15 of the following conditions are satisfied: 16 (i) The student takes the assessment at a date and time that 17 are assigned by personnel designated by the school district, 18 accredited nonpublic school, or charter school. 19 (ii) The student participates in a synchronous assessment 20 session that is initiated and managed by personnel designated 21 by the school district, accredited nonpublic school, or charter 22 school. 23 (iii) (A) The student takes the assessment using a device 24 and an assessment platform that allow an assessment proctor to 25 monitor the student for the duration of the assessment through 26 a video feed that allows the assessment proctor to view the 27 student taking the assessment and the studentâs background. 28 (B) If the device or assessment platform does not allow 29 an assessment proctor to monitor the student for the duration 30 of the assessment through a video feed in accordance with 31 subparagraph part (A), the requirements of this subparagraph 32 subdivision shall be satisfied if an assessment proctor is able 33 to, through the use of a second device, monitor the student 34 for the duration of the assessment through a video feed that 35 -1- LSB 1245SV (3) 91 jda/jh 1/ 2 S.F. 211 allows the assessment proctor to view the student taking the 1 assessment and the studentâs background. 2 (iv) The school district, accredited nonpublic school, 3 or charter school maintains a ratio of students taking the 4 assessment to assessment proctors of not greater than ten to 5 one. 6 (v) The student does not exit the assessment session until 7 instructed to do so by the assessment proctor. 8 (vi) An assessment administrator employed by the school 9 district, accredited nonpublic school, or charter school 10 verifies student submission of the assessment. 11